Be It Enacted by the People of the State of Oregon:
SECTION 1. There are appropriated to the  Department of Human Services, for the
biennium beginning July 1, 2025, out of the General Fund, the following amounts,  for the
following purposes:
(1) Central services ....................  $ 92,233,035
(2) State assessments and
enterprise-wide costs ............ $ 469,678,563
(3) Self-sufficiency programs ...... $ 338,487,057
(4) Vocational rehabilitation
services ................................. $ 44,880,988
(5) Child welfare programs......... $ 1,143,571,058
(6) Aging and people with
disabilities programs.............  $ 2,415,198,285
(7) Intellectual/developmental
disabilities programs.............  $ 2,486,190,022
(8) Oregon Eligibility
Partnership...........................  $ 438,234,577
(9) Debt service ..........................  $ 10,107,625
SECTION 2. Notwithstanding any other law limiting  expenditures, the following amounts
are established for the biennium beginning July 1, 2025, as the maximum limits for  payment
of expenses from  fees, moneys or other revenues, including Miscellaneous Receipts and
Medicare receipts and including federal funds for indirect  cost recovery, Social Security
Supplemental Security Income recoveries and the Child Care and  Development Fund, but
excluding lottery funds and federal funds not described  in this section, collected or received
by the Department of Human Services, for the following purposes:
(1) Central services .................... $ 16,551,178
(2) State assessments and
enterprise-wide costs ............ $ 62,692,588
(3) Self-sufficiency programs ...... $ 487,414,104
(4) Vocational rehabilitation
Enrolled Senate Bill 5526 (SB 5526-A) Page 1
services ................................. $ 3,207,470
(5) Child welfare programs......... $ 44,914,816
(6) Aging and people with
disabilities programs............. $ 407,671,744
(7) Intellectual/developmental
disabilities programs............. $ 34,277,316
(8) Shared services ..................... $ 234,099,669
(9) Oregon Eligibility
Partnership........................... $ 12,302,457
(10) Aging and people with
disabilities - ARPA State
Fiscal Recovery Fund moneys
for long term care workforce
development and emergency
preparedness......................... $ 606,669
SECTION 3.
Notwithstanding any other law limiting  expenditures, the following amounts
are established for the biennium beginning July 1, 2025, as the maximum limits for payment
of expenses from federal funds, excluding federal funds described in  section 2 of this 2025
Act, collected or received by the Department of Human  Services, for the following purposes:
(1) Central services .................... $ 62,336,860
(2) State assessments and
enterprise-wide costs ............ $ 307,033,111
(3) Self-sufficiency programs ...... $ 668,504,367
(4) Vocational rehabilitation
services ................................. $ 104,590,608
(5) Child welfare programs......... $ 634,959,911
(6) Aging and people with
disabilities programs.............  $ 4,170,072,538
(7) Intellectual/developmental
disabilities programs.............  $ 4,378,753,565
(8) Oregon Eligibility
Partnership...........................  $ 524,534,304
SECTION 4. For the  biennium beginning July 1, 2025, expenditures by the Department
of Human Services for federal supplemental nutrition assistance payments are not limited.
SECTION 5. This 2025 Act being necessary for the immediate preservation of the public
peace, health and safety, an emergency  is declared to exist, and this 2025 Act takes effect
July 1, 2025.
Enrolled Senate Bill 5526 (SB 5526-A) Page 2
Passed by Senate June 18, 2025
..................................................................................
Obadiah Rutledge, Secretary of Senate
..................................................................................
Rob Wagner, President of Senate
Passed by House June 23, 2025
..................................................................................
Julie Fahey, Speaker of House
Received by Governor:
........................M.,........................................................., 2025
Approved:
........................M.,........................................................., 2025
..................................................................................
Tina Kotek, Governor
Filed in Office of Secretary of State:
........................M.,........................................................., 2025
..................................................................................
Tobias Read, Secretary of State
Enrolled Senate Bill 5526 (SB 5526-A) Page 3